Wyoming statutes. Title 22 Elections
Article 1. In General

§ 22-24-101.
[Repealed.]

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-366; repealed by 2015 ch. 6, § 2, effective February 25, 2015.

§ 22-24-102.
[Repealed.]

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-367; repealed by 2015 ch. 6, § 2, effective February 25, 2015.

§ 22-24-103.
[Repealed.]

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-368; Laws 1993, ch. 146, § 2; repealed by 2015 ch. 6, § 2, effective February 25, 2015.

§ 22-24-104.
[Repealed.]

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-369; Laws 1995, ch. 83, § 1; 1998, ch. 100, §§ 2, 5; 2000, ch. 67, § 1; repealed by 2015 ch. 6, § 2, effective February 25, 2015.

§ 22-24-105.
[Repealed.]

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-370; Laws 1995, ch. 83, § 1; 1998, ch. 100, § 2; 2000, ch. 67, § 1; repealed by 2015 ch. 6, § 2, effective February 25, 2015.

§ 22-24-106.
[Repealed.]

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-371; repealed by 2015 ch. 6, § 2, effective February 25, 2015.

§ 22-24-107.
[Repealed.]

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-372; Laws 2000, ch. 67, § 1; repealed by 2015 ch. 6, § 2, effective February 25, 2015; 2015 ch. 76, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

§ 22-24-108.
[Repealed.]

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-373; Laws 1995, ch. 83, § 1; repealed by 2015 ch. 6, § 2, effective February 25, 2015.

§ 22-24-109.
[Repealed.]

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-374; Laws 1995, ch. 83, § 1; 1998, ch. 100, § 2; 2000, ch. 67, § 1; repealed by 2015 ch. 6, § 2, effective February 25, 2015.

§ 22-24-110.
[Repealed.]

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-375; Laws 1996, ch. 99, § 1; 1998, ch. 100, § 2; 2000, ch. 67, § 1; repealed by 2015 ch. 6, § 2, effective February 25, 2015.

§ 22-24-111.
[Repealed.]

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-376; repealed by 2015 ch. 6, § 2, effective February 25, 2015.

§ 22-24-112.
[Repealed.]

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-377; Laws 2000, ch. 67, § 1; 2001, ch. 177, § 1; 2004, ch. 42, § 1; ch. 94, § 2; repealed by 2015 ch. 6, § 2, effective February 25, 2015.

§ 22-24-113.
[Repealed.]

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-378; repealed by 2015 ch. 6, § 2, effective February 25, 2015.

§ 22-24-114.
[Repealed.]

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-379; Laws 2000, ch. 67, § 1; repealed by 2015 ch. 6, § 2, effective February 25, 2015.

§ 22-24-115.
[Repealed.]

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-380; Laws 1985, ch. 157, § 1; repealed by 2015 ch. 6, § 2, effective February 25, 2015.

§ 22-24-116.
[Repealed.]

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-381; 1998, ch. 100, § 2; 2000, ch. 67, § 1; repealed by 2015 ch. 6, § 2, effective February 25, 2015.

§ 22-24-117.
[Repealed.]

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-382; 1995, ch. 83, § 1; 1998, ch. 100, § 2; repealed by 2015 ch. 6, § 2, effective February 25, 2015.

§ 22-24-118.
[Repealed.]

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-383; 1993, ch. 201, § 2; repealed by 2015 ch. 6, § 2, effective February 25, 2015.

§ 22-24-119.
[Repealed.]

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-384; repealed by 2015 ch. 6, § 2, effective February 25, 2015.

§ 22-24-120.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 100, § 5.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1, related to the enactment of initiated measures and rejection by referendum.

§ 22-24-121.
[Repealed.]

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-386; repealed by 2015 ch. 6, § 2, effective February 25, 2015.

§ 22-24-122.
[Repealed.]

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-387; Laws 1995, ch. 83, § 1; 1996, ch. 66, § 1; 1998, ch. 100, § 2; repealed by 2015 ch. 6, § 2, effective February 25, 2015.

§ 22-24-123.
[Repealed.]

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-388; Laws 2000, ch. 67, § 1; repealed by 2015 ch. 6, § 2, effective February 25, 2015.

§ 22-24-124.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 100, § 5.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1994, ch. 49, § 2, required a ballot statement of the estimated loss or gain in revenue where a proposal related to the investment of permanent state funds.

§ 22-24-125.
[Repealed.]

History.

Laws 1996, ch. 105, § 1; 1997, ch. 105, § 1; 2000, ch. 67, § 1; repealed by 2015 ch. 6, § 2, effective February 25, 2015.